District of Columbia statutes.
15-321

Enforcement of interlocutory decrees.

An interlocutory order may be enforced by such process as might be had upon a final judgment or decree to the like effect, and the payment of costs adjudged to a party may be enforced in like manner.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 528, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-321.
1973 Ed., § 15-321.